Louisiana, session 2026, HB475.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:22.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§22.1. Recordings; artificial intelligence; disclosure
A. A healthcare professional licensed by this Title shall verbally disclose the
use of any recording device, software, or service to a patient before recording any
part of an appointment or treatment to be transcribed by artificial intelligence.
B. Any healthcare professional who violates the provisions of this Section
may be subject to disciplinary action by his professional licensing board and shall
be immune from civil liability in the absence of gross negligence or willful
misconduct.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.